Massachusetts, session 194th, H2938.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 4 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out, in lines 145 to 150, the words "Notwithstanding the provisions
of this chapter or any other general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a member in
service of a retirement system as defined in section one who is a veteran who served in the armed
forces of the United States shall be entitled to credit for active service in the armed services of
the United States” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Notwithstanding the
provisions of this chapter or any other general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a
member in service of a retirement system as defined in section 1 who is a veteran who served in
the armed forces of the United States or a member of the Massachusetts National Guard who is a
member in service of the state employees’ retirement system shall be entitled to creditable
of 2

service time for active service in the armed services of the United States or service in the
Massachusetts National Guard.
of 2